North Carolina, session 2025, HB1211.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 53 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new Article
to read:
"Article 21A.
"Home Equity Investment Loans.
"§ 53-274.1. Title.
This Article shall be known and may be cited as the "Home Equity Investment Loan Act."
"§ 53-274.2. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Commissioner. – The Commissioner of Banks of this State.
(2) Company. – Any person that makes, brokers, purchases, or services a home
equity investment loan.
(3) Dwelling. – As defined in G.S. 53-244.030(9).
(4) Home equity investment loan or loan. – A transaction or arrangement,
including an option contract, futures contract, derivative, shared appreciation
agreement, shared value agreement, home equity sharing agreement, home
equity investment, equity investment option, or similar agreement, however
denominated, under which funds are advanced to or on behalf of a homeowner
and a person obtains a right to receive from or on behalf of the homeowner,
or from the proceeds of the dwelling or residential real estate, an amount
determined in whole or in part by reference to the value, equity, appreciation,
sale proceeds, or future value of a dwelling or of residential real estate upon
which a dwelling is constructed or intended to be constructed. The term
includes any transaction or arrangement described in this subdivision that is
secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other equivalent consensual security
interest in a dwelling located in this State or in residential real estate upon
which there is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling, and any
transaction or arrangement structured to evade the application of this Article.
*H1211-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
The term does not include a transaction or arrangement made, insured,
guaranteed, or administered by a federal, State, or local government agency,
a government-sponsored enterprise, or an agency or enterprise of a political
subdivision of this State.
(5) Homeowner. – A natural person who receives funds under a home equity
investment loan and who, at the time of application or closing, owns and
occupies, or intends to occupy, the dwelling securing the loan as the person's
principal dwelling.
(6) Residential real estate. – As defined in G.S. 53-244.030(31).
"§ 53-274.3. Applicability; construction.
(a) A home equity investment loan is a residential mortgage loan for purposes of this
Chapter and Chapters 24 and 45 of the General Statutes and is subject to all otherwise applicable
State residential mortgage laws, including licensing, collection, foreclosure, and usury laws.
(b) A home equity investment loan shall not be treated as a reverse mortgage transaction
for purposes of any exclusion, exception, or limitation under Chapter 24 or Chapter 45 of the
General Statutes unless the transaction independently satisfies Article 21 of this Chapter.
(c) Regardless of how a transaction is denominated, labeled, or structured, including as
an investment, option, sale of future appreciation, sale of an interest in equity, shared appreciation
agreement, shared value agreement, or similar arrangement, any transaction that in substance
meets the definition of a home equity investment loan under G.S. 53-274.2 is governed by this
Article.
"§ 53-274.4. Licensing; home equity investment loan authorization and fees; purchasers
and assignees.
(a) No person shall make, broker, or service a home equity investment loan with respect
to a dwelling located in this State unless the person is authorized to engage in the mortgage
business under Article 19B of this Chapter.
(b) A person authorized to engage in the mortgage business under Article 19B of this
Chapter shall not make a home equity investment loan on or after October 1, 2026, unless the
person is authorized by the Commissioner to make home equity investment loans under this
subsection. The Commissioner may accept applications and fees under this subsection before
October 1, 2026. An application for authorization shall be in writing, in the form prescribed by
the Commissioner, and accompanied by a nonrefundable fee of five hundred dollars ($500.00).
Authorization under this subsection expires annually and may be renewed in the form prescribed
by the Commissioner upon payment of a renewal fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00).
(c) A purchaser or assignee of a home equity investment loan is subject to this Article to
the extent the purchaser or assignee owns, holds, services, collects, or enforces the loan. This
section does not require licensure under Article 19B of this Chapter or authorization under
subsection (b) of this section solely because a person purchases or acquires a home equity
investment loan, but a purchaser or assignee that services the loan or otherwise engages in the
mortgage business is subject to Article 19B of this Chapter.
(d) Notwithstanding any agreement to the contrary, a purchaser or assignee of a home
equity investment loan is subject to all affirmative claims, counterclaims, defenses, rights of
setoff, and rights of recoupment with respect to the loan that the homeowner may assert against
the company or any prior holder, servicer, or assignee of the loan.
"§ 53-274.5. Required disclosures.
(a) Within 10 business days after application, and in any event not less than 20 business
days before closing, a company shall provide to the homeowner all of the following and any
additional disclosures required by the Commissioner by rule:
(1) A statement that the transaction is a residential mortgage loan secured by the
homeowner's dwelling and that failure to pay may result in foreclosure or
forced sale of the dwelling.
Page 2 House Bill 1211-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The amount of funds to be advanced to the homeowner.
(3) The maximum dollar amount, if any, that the homeowner may be required to
pay, and if there is no maximum dollar amount, a clear and conspicuous
statement that the amount due is not subject to a dollar cap.
(4) The term of the loan and each event that may trigger payment or acceleration.
(5) The method that will be used to determine the value of the dwelling at
origination and at payment.
(6) The specific value-based payment formula elected in the contract, the
contractual payment cap required by G.S. 53-274.9, and a statement that a
contract that exceeds, omits, or provides for value-based payment in a manner
not authorized by that section is void and unenforceable against the
homeowner.
(7) A statement that the company shall pay all closing costs, the actual and
reasonable fees and expenses of the attorney required by G.S. 53-274.6, and
the actual and reasonable fees and expenses of the housing counseling
required by G.S. 53-274.7.
(8) A description of the market-rate refinance option required by G.S. 53-274.11.
(9) Illustrative examples of the total amount due at payment assuming no
appreciation, moderate appreciation, and high appreciation of the dwelling, as
specified by the Commissioner by rule.
(10) The name, address, telephone number, and electronic mail address, if any, of
the company employee or agent designated to respond to inquiries concerning
the loan.
(b) The disclosures required by this section shall be clear and conspicuous and may not
be waived by the homeowner. The disclosures shall be provided in English and in each other
language in which the company, or a person acting on its behalf, advertises, solicits, negotiates,
or explains the transaction to the homeowner.
(c) The Commissioner may prescribe by rule forms for disclosures required by this
section. Until a form becomes effective, a company complies with this section by providing the
disclosures in a clear written document containing the information required by this section.
"§ 53-274.6. Independent legal counsel.
(a) A company shall not close a home equity investment loan unless the homeowner has
been represented in the transaction by an attorney licensed to practice law in this State who is
selected by the homeowner and who certifies in writing that the attorney has explained the
material terms and legal consequences of the transaction to the homeowner.
(b) The company shall pay the actual and reasonable fees and expenses of the attorney
required by this section and shall not directly or indirectly seek reimbursement from the
homeowner.
(c) A waiver of the requirements of this section is void.
"§ 53-274.7. Housing counseling.
(a) A company shall not close a home equity investment loan unless the homeowner has
received counseling from a housing counselor approved or designated by the Commissioner and
selected by the homeowner, and the company has received written certification from the
counselor that the homeowner has received counseling on the advisability of the home equity
investment loan, the material terms and payment triggers of the loan, the risk of foreclosure or
forced sale, the availability of other financial options and resources, and potential tax
consequences.
(b) The Commissioner may adopt rules establishing standards for housing counselor
approval, training, certification, and disclosures under this section. Until rules become effective,
the Commissioner may designate as approved counselors counselors whose names are
maintained on the Commissioner's list of approved reverse mortgage counselors under Article 21
House Bill 1211-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
of this Chapter or counselors employed by housing counseling agencies approved by the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development.
(c) The company shall pay the actual and reasonable fees and expenses of counseling
required by this section and shall not directly or indirectly seek reimbursement from the
homeowner.
(d) A waiver of the requirements of this section is void.
"§ 53-274.8. Closing costs.
(a) The company shall pay all closing costs associated with a home equity investment
loan.
(b) No company shall directly or indirectly charge, collect, finance, capitalize, or include
in the amount due under a home equity investment loan any application fee, authorization fee or
renewal fee required by G.S. 53-274.4(b), origination fee, broker fee, appraisal fee, title fee,
settlement fee, recording fee, document preparation fee, underwriting fee, processing fee, notary
fee, courier fee, or similar cost.
(c) A contract term in violation of this section is void.
"§ 53-274.9. Permitted value-based payment; contractual payment cap; valuation; void
terms.
(a) A home equity investment loan may require payment determined in whole or in part
by reference to the value, equity, appreciation, sale proceeds, or future value of the dwelling or
residential real estate only as expressly authorized by this section.
(b) The total amount that may be required to be paid by or on behalf of a homeowner to
satisfy a home equity investment loan may not exceed the sum of all of the following:
(1) The total amount of funds actually advanced to or for the benefit of the
homeowner, excluding any amount the company is required to pay under this
Article.
(2) The total amount of property taxes, insurance premiums, assessments, and
other similar charges actually and reasonably advanced by the company to
protect the collateral and not reimbursed by the homeowner within 60 days
after the date of payment.
(3) Only one of the following amounts, if expressly elected in the contract:
a. Shared appreciation. – An amount not exceeding ten percent (10%) of
the increase in the value of the property from the date of origination of
the loan to the date of payment.
b. Shared value. – An amount not exceeding ten percent (10%) of the
value of the property at the time of payment.
(c) No amount described in subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section is due,
collectible, or enforceable unless the home equity investment loan has been outstanding for at
least 24 months. This subsection does not prohibit a homeowner from satisfying the loan before
that period by paying the amounts described in subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection (b) of this
section.
(d) A contract term that calculates or requires payment by reference to the value, equity,
appreciation, sale proceeds, or future value of the dwelling or residential real estate in any manner
not expressly authorized by this section is void and unenforceable.
(e) No company shall contract for, receive, collect, or attempt to collect from or on behalf
of the homeowner any amount, however denominated, except as expressly authorized by this
section.
(f) For purposes of this section, the value of the property at origination shall be the fair
market value of the property, as determined by an appraisal performed by an appraiser licensed
or certified under Chapter 93E of the General Statutes. The company shall not apply any discount,
risk adjustment, or other reduction to the appraised fair market value. The company shall provide
a copy of the appraisal to the homeowner not less than 20 business days before closing. If
Page 4 House Bill 1211-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
payment is not made in conjunction with a bona fide arm's-length sale of the property, the value
of the property at the time of payment shall be the fair market value of the property, as determined
by an appraisal performed by an appraiser licensed or certified under Chapter 93E of the General
Statutes. If the parties are unable to agree on a single appraiser within 30 days after written
demand for payment, each party may obtain an appraisal, and the value of the property shall be
the average of the appraisals. If the homeowner does not obtain an appraisal within 30 days after
the company provides the homeowner a copy of the company's appraisal, the company may rely
on its appraisal.
(g) If payment is made in conjunction with a bona fide arm's-length sale of the property,
the value of the property at the time of payment is the sale price, less the actual and reasonable
costs of sale.
(h) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the application of Chapter 24 of the
General Statutes to a home equity investment loan or to prevent any amount required to be paid
by or on behalf of a homeowner under a home equity investment loan from being treated as
interest, charges, or consideration for the use or forbearance of money. Any amount required to
be paid by or on behalf of a homeowner under a home equity investment loan in excess of the
amounts authorized by this section shall be treated as interest, charges, or consideration for the
use or forbearance of money for purposes of Chapter 24 of the General Statutes.
(i) A home equity investment loan contract that exceeds the payment cap required by
this section, omits the applicable cap, or provides for value-based payment in a manner not
expressly authorized by this section is void and unenforceable against the homeowner.
"§ 53-274.10. Homeowner protections.
(a) Prepayment of a home equity investment loan, in whole or in part, shall be permitted
without penalty at any time during the term of the loan.
(b) The company's sole remedy after the loan becomes due is to enforce the debt through
the property securing the loan, and the company shall not obtain a deficiency judgment against
the homeowner.
(c) A home equity investment loan contract may not waive or disclaim any protection
provided to the homeowner by this Article.
"§ 53-274.11. Payment; refinance option; foreclosure.
(a) A home equity investment loan contract may provide that the loan becomes due only
upon one or more of the following:
(1) The scheduled maturity date of the loan.
(2) The homeowner sells or otherwise voluntarily conveys title to the dwelling.
(3) The homeowner fails to pay property taxes, insurance premiums, or
assessments affecting the dwelling and does not cure the failure within 90 days
after written notice from the company.
(4) The homeowner commits waste that materially impairs the security for the
loan and fails to cure the impairment within 90 days after written notice from
the company.
(5) The homeowner dies and the dwelling is no longer occupied as a principal
dwelling by any person who is a surviving joint owner, surviving spouse, heir,
devisee, or other successor in interest and who holds or succeeds to an
ownership interest in the dwelling and remains bound by the security
instrument.
(b) If a home equity investment loan becomes due and the homeowner notifies the
company then entitled to collect or enforce the loan that the homeowner cannot pay without
selling the dwelling, the company shall, directly or through a person authorized to engage in the
mortgage business under Article 19B of this Chapter and before initiating foreclosure or
otherwise enforcing the security instrument, offer the homeowner a market-rate refinance under
all of the following:
House Bill 1211-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Converts the amount due into a closed-end residential mortgage loan.
(2) Provides a fixed interest rate not exceeding the average prime offer rate for a
comparable transaction, as published by the Consumer Financial Protection
Bureau or its successor, on the date of the offer.
(3) Requires substantially equal monthly payments of principal and interest over
a term of not less than 120 months.
(4) Does not require points, origination fees, or a prepayment penalty.
(c) When a homeowner's obligation to pay a home equity investment loan is triggered
under subsection (a) of this section, in addition to any other notice required by Chapter 45 of the
General Statutes, the company shall give the homeowner not less than 90 days' written notice
and an opportunity to cure before commencing foreclosure or otherwise enforcing the debt.
"§ 53-274.12. Annual statement and account history.
Within 60 days after the end of each calendar year and when the loan becomes due, the
company shall issue to the homeowner a written statement regarding the activity of the loan for
the preceding calendar year, or for the period since the last statement was provided. The statement
shall include all of the following:
(1) The amount advanced to the homeowner during the statement period and
cumulatively.
(2) Any taxes, insurance premiums, assessments, or similar protective advances
paid by the company during the statement period and cumulatively.
(3) Any amounts paid by or on behalf of the homeowner during the statement
period and cumulatively.
(4) The current amount that would be due if the loan were paid on the date of the
statement without a sale, calculated in accordance with G.S. 53-274.9.
(5) The method most recently used to determine the value of the dwelling for
purposes of the loan.
(6) The name, address, telephone number, and electronic mail address, if any, of
the company employee or agent designated to respond to inquiries concerning
the loan.
"§ 53-274.13. Company default.
(a) A company's failure to advance funds to or on behalf of the homeowner, pay an
amount the company is required to pay to or for the benefit of the homeowner under this Article,
or otherwise perform a material funding obligation under a home equity investment loan contract
or written commitment is a default by the company.
(b) Upon default by the company, the company forfeits any right to collect an amount
described in G.S. 53-274.9(b)(3), interest, fees, charges, or any other amount in excess of the
funds actually advanced to or for the benefit of the homeowner, excluding any amount the
company is required to pay under this Article, and any protective advances described in
G.S. 53-274.9(b)(2). The company's right to recover when the loan becomes due is limited to
those amounts, less all amounts paid by or on behalf of the homeowner.
(c) Subsection (b) of this section does not apply if the company cures the default within
the time stated in the home equity investment loan contract or written commitment or within 30
days after receiving written notice from the homeowner that the advance, payment, or other
performance was not made, whichever is later.
(d) The remedies in this section are in addition to any other remedy available under this
Article or other law.
"§ 53-274.14. Prohibited acts.
(a) A company shall not engage in any of the following acts in connection with the
making, brokering, purchasing, servicing, collecting, or enforcing of a home equity investment
loan:
Page 6 House Bill 1211-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Misrepresenting material facts, making false promises, or engaging in a course
of misrepresentation through agents or otherwise.
(2) Failing to provide disclosures in accordance with this Article.
(3) Closing a loan without receiving each certification required by G.S. 53-274.6
and G.S. 53-274.7.
(4) Improperly refusing to issue a satisfaction of the security instrument.
(5) Failing, within 10 business days after written request from the homeowner or
the holder or servicer of an existing loan secured by a first lien on the dwelling,
to execute and deliver in recordable form, without charge to the homeowner,
a subordination agreement subordinating the home equity investment loan and
any security instrument or other recorded instrument securing, evidencing, or
making enforceable the home equity investment loan to any refinancing or
modification of that existing first lien loan.
(6) Contracting for or enforcing a provision that prohibits, limits, or penalizes a
homeowner's disclosure to any person of the existence, terms, cost, risks, or
performance of a home equity investment loan.
(7) Contracting for, receiving, collecting, or attempting to collect any amount
prohibited by G.S. 53-274.8 or G.S. 53-274.9.
(8) Failing to offer the market-rate refinance option required by G.S. 53-274.11.
(9) Defaulting under G.S. 53-274.13 and failing to cure the default within the time
allowed by that section.
(10) Failing to comply with this Article.
(b) A provision described in subdivision (6) of subsection (a) of this section is void and
unenforceable against the homeowner.
"§ 53-274.15. Rules.
The Commissioner may adopt rules necessary to implement and enforce this Article.
"§ 53-274.16. Enforcement and civil remedies.
(a) In addition to any authority under Article 19B of this Chapter, the Commissioner
may, after notice and opportunity for hearing, order a company to cease and desist from
violating this Article or any rule adopted under this Article and may impose a civil penalty of
not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation. For purposes of this subsection,
each loan transaction and each failure to provide a disclosure, notice, certification, cure
opportunity, or satisfaction required by this Article constitutes a separate violation.
(b) Upon a finding that a company has violated this Article, the Commissioner may
suspend or revoke any license held by the company under Article 19B of this Chapter to the
extent permitted by law.
(c) A violation of this Article is an unfair or deceptive act or practice in or affecting
commerce under G.S. 75-1.1."
SECTION 2. G.S. 53-244.030(30) reads as rewritten:
"(30) Residential mortgage loan. – Any loan or obligation made or represented to
be made to one or more individuals primarily for personal, family, or
household use that is secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other equivalent
consensual security interest on a dwelling located within this State or
residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed
a dwelling. This term includes reverse mortgage loans under Article 21 of this
Chapter Chapter, home equity investment loans under Article 21A of this
Chapter, and contracts for deed under Chapter 47H of the General Statutes."
SECTION 3. G.S. 53-244.118(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The Commissioner may adopt any rules that the Commissioner deems necessary to
carry out the provisions of this Article, to provide for the protection of the borrowing public, to
prohibit unfair or deceptive practices, to instruct licensees or registrants in interpreting this
House Bill 1211-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Article, and to implement and interpret the provisions of G.S. 24-1.1E, 24-1.1F, and 24-10.2
24-10.2, and 24-10.3 as they apply to licensees and registrants under this Article. "
SECTION 4.(a) G.S. 24-9(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) The provisions of G.S. 24-1.2A, 24-11, and 24-11.1 shall not apply to equity lines of
credit offered by banks. Except as provided in this subsection and notwithstanding any other
provision of this Chapter or any other provision of State law, any bank may charge and collect
from any borrower interest at any rate and fees and other charges in any amount that the borrower
agrees to pay in connection with an equity line of credit. However, an equity line of credit made
by a bank shall be subject to the following, to the extent otherwise applicable:
(1) The provisions of G.S. 24-1.1E (relating to restrictions and limitations on
high-cost home loans).
(2) The provisions of G.S. 24-10.2 (relating to consumer protections in certain
home loans).
(2a) The provisions of G.S. 24-10.3 (relating to certain mandatory arbitration
provisions prohibited in covered mortgage transactions).
(3) Notwithstanding the limitation against prepayment penalties contained in
G.S. 45-82.4, a bank may charge and collect prepayment fees or penalties
following the borrower's voluntary exercise of a right or option to repay all or
any portion of the outstanding balance of a variable interest rate equity line of
credit at a fixed interest rate over a specified period of time, subject to the
following limitations:
a. Prepayment fees or penalties may be charged only with respect to the
prepayment of that portion of the outstanding balance the borrower
voluntarily agrees to repay at a fixed interest rate over a specified time;
b. No prepayment fees or penalties may be charged for prepayments
made more than 30 months after the borrower voluntarily exercises the
right or option to repay that portion of the outstanding balance of the
equity line of credit at a fixed interest rate over a specified period of
time; and
c. The prepayment fees or penalties charged with respect to that portion
of the outstanding balance to be repaid at a fixed rate over a specified
period of time may not exceed, in the aggregate, more than two percent
(2%) of the amount prepaid.
Otherwise, no prepayment fees or penalties may be charged or collected by
the bank with respect to an equity line of credit."
SECTION 4.(b) G.S. 24-9 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(e) This section does not apply to a home equity investment loan under Article 21A of
Chapter 53 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 5. G.S. 24-10.2(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) For purposes of this section, the term "consumer home loan" means a loan, including
an open-end credit plan but excluding a reverse mortgage transaction, in which (i) the borrower
is a natural person, (ii) the debt is incurred by the borrower primarily for personal, family, or
household purposes, and (iii) the loan is secured by a mortgage or deed of trust upon real estate
upon which there is located or there is to be located a structure or structures designed principally
for occupancy of from one to four families which is or will be occupied by the borrower as the
borrower's principal dwelling. The term also includes a home equity investment loan under
Article 21A of Chapter 53 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 6. Chapter 24 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new section
to read:
"§ 24-10.3. Certain mandatory arbitration provisions prohibited in covered mortgage
transactions.
Page 8 House Bill 1211-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Borrower. – A natural person obligated or applying to become obligated on a
covered mortgage transaction.
(2) Covered mortgage transaction. – Any of the following:
a. A residential mortgage loan, as defined in G.S. 53-244.030(30),
including a contract for deed under Chapter 47H of the General
Statutes.
b. An extension of credit under an open-end consumer credit plan
secured by the principal dwelling of the borrower.
(b) To the extent prohibited by 15 U.S.C. § 1639c(e), as amended, 12 C.F.R. §
1026.36(h), as amended, or any successor provision, no covered mortgage transaction and no
contract or other agreement relating to a covered mortgage transaction may include terms that
require arbitration or any other nonjudicial procedure as the method for resolving any controversy
or settling any claims arising out of the transaction.
(c) This section does not prohibit a borrower and a creditor, company, lender, holder,
assignee, or servicer from agreeing, after a dispute or claim arises, to arbitration or another
nonjudicial procedure to resolve that dispute or claim.
(d) To the extent prohibited by 15 U.S.C. § 1639c(e), as amended, 12 C.F.R. §
1026.36(h), as amended, or any successor provision, no covered mortgage transaction and no
contract or other agreement relating to a covered mortgage transaction may be applied or
interpreted so as to bar a borrower from bringing an action in any court of competent jurisdiction
pursuant to State or federal law for damages or other relief in connection with an alleged violation
of law.
(e) A term included in violation of this section is void and unenforceable.
(f) This section shall be construed consistent with 15 U.S.C. § 1639c(e), 12 C.F.R. §
1026.36(h), and any successor provision.
(g) A violation of this section is an unfair or deceptive act or practice in or affecting
commerce under G.S. 75-1.1."
SECTION 7. G.S. 45-101(1b) reads as rewritten:
"(1b) Home loan. – Any of the following:
a. A loan that has all of the following characteristics:
a. 1. The loan is not (i) an equity line of credit as defined in
G.S. 24-9, (ii) a construction loan as defined in G.S. 24-10, (iii)
a reverse mortgage transaction, or (iv) a bridge loan with a term
of 12 months or less, such as a loan to purchase a new dwelling
where the borrower plans to sell a current dwelling within 12
months.
b. 2. The borrower is a natural person.
c. 3. The debt is incurred by the borrower primarily for personal,
family, or household purposes.
d. 4. The principal amount of the loan does not exceed the
conforming loan size limit for a single-family dwelling as
established from time to time by Fannie Mae.
e. 5. The loan is secured by (i) a security interest in a manufactured
home, as defined in G.S. 143-145, in the State which is or will
be occupied by the borrower as the borrower's principal
dwelling, (ii) a mortgage or deed of trust on real property in the
State upon which there is located an existing structure designed
principally for occupancy of from one to four families that is
or will be occupied by the borrower as the borrower's principal
dwelling, or (iii) a mortgage or deed of trust on real property
House Bill 1211-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
in the State upon which there is to be constructed using the loan
proceeds a structure or structures designed principally for
occupancy of from one to four families which, when
completed, will be occupied by the borrower as the borrower's
principal dwelling.
f. 6. A purpose of the loan is to (i) purchase the dwelling, (ii)
construct, repair, rehabilitate, remodel, or improve the
dwelling or the real property on which it is located, (iii) satisfy
and replace an existing obligation secured by the same real
property, or (iv) consolidate existing consumer debts into a
new home loan.
b. A home equity investment loan under Article 21A of Chapter 53 of the
General Statutes secured by the borrower's principal dwelling."
SECTION 8. Until rules adopted under G.S. 53-274.15 specifying the examples
required by G.S. 53-274.5(a)(9), as enacted by Section 1 of this act, become effective, a company
complies with G.S. 53-274.5(a)(9) by providing examples of the total amount due at payment
assuming (i) no appreciation, (ii) annual appreciation of three percent (3%), and (iii) annual
appreciation of six percent (6%).
SECTION 9.(a) G.S. 53-274.4(b) and G.S. 53-274.15, as enacted by Section 1 of this
act, are effective when this act becomes law.
SECTION 9.(b) Section 2 of this act, Section 3 of this act, Section 4(a) of this act,
and Section 6 of this act become effective October 1, 2026. Section 2 of this act applies to home
equity investment loans and contracts for deed entered into on or after that date. Section 4(a) of
this act applies to equity lines of credit entered into on or after that date. Section 6 of this act
applies to covered mortgage transactions entered into, and to contracts or other agreements
relating to covered mortgage transactions executed, on or after that date.
SECTION 9.(c) The remainder of Section 1 of this act, Section 4(b) of this act, and
Sections 5, 7, and 8 of this act become effective October 1, 2026, and apply to home equity
investment loan applications made on or after that date.
SECTION 9.(d) The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 10 House Bill 1211-First Edition